New York, session 2025-2026, A3029.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph c of subdivision 2 of section 377 of the execu- 2 tive law, as added by chapter 707 of the laws of 1981, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 c. permit to the fullest extent feasible, use of modern technical 5 methods, devices and improvements which tend to reduce the cost of 6 construction, including the reuse of deconstructed building materials, 7 without substantially affecting reasonable requirements for the health, 8 safety and security of the occupants or users of buildings; 9 § 2. Section 378 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 10 subdivision 19-a to read as follows: 11 19-a. a. To support the goal of zero on-site greenhouse gas emissions 12 and help achieve the state's clear energy and climate agenda, including 13 but not limited to greenhouse gas reduction requirements set forth with- 14 in chapter one hundred six of the laws of two thousand nineteen, also 15 known as the New York state climate leadership and community protection 16 act, the uniform code shall set standards for the use of salvage lumber 17 that has been previously used in buildings or other structures in 18 construction and for the grading of salvage lumber. 19 b. The uniform code shall provide that salvage lumber shall be permit- 20 ted to use not greater than ninety percent of the design values assigned 21 to the species and grade of sawn lumber in the American Wood Council 22 National Design Specification, provided an approved entity, including, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00127-02-6 A. 3029--A 2 1 but not limited to, a grading or inspection agency or registered design 2 professional, provides verification of compliance with all of the 3 following conditions: 4 (i) the salvage lumber is identified by a grade mark conforming with 5 International Residential Code R602.1.1 for sawn lumber, or is accompa- 6 nied by a certificate of inspection issued by a lumber grading or 7 inspection agency conforming with International Residential Code 8 R602.1.1 for sawn lumber detailing the species and grade; 9 (ii) the salvage lumber is free of net section reductions exceeding 10 the limitations permitted for the assigned grade; 11 (iii) the salvage lumber is free of areas of decay, fire damage or 12 insect damage exceeding the limitations permitted for the assigned 13 grade; 14 (iv) the salvage lumber shows no signs of failure or strength reducing 15 characteristics exceeding the limitations permitted for the assigned 16 grade as a result of structural loading, deconstruction, or other caus- 17 es; 18 (v) the salvage lumber has not been subjected to temperatures contin- 19 uously above one hundred degrees Fahrenheit (thirty-eight degrees Celsi- 20 us), both day and night, for a period exceeding six months; and 21 (vi) the word "Salvage" and the name of the approved entity confirming 22 compliance with subparagraphs (i) through (v) of this paragraph shall be 23 legibly and permanently applied in indelible ink. 24 § 3. Section 376 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 25 subdivision 7 to read as follows: 26 7. To develop a program for grading salvage lumber for structural 27 purposes. The program shall be developed in consultation with industry 28 stakeholders and shall include standards for determining the structural 29 integrity of salvage lumber. The program shall be updated as necessary 30 to reflect advances in technology and best practices. 31 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.